Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-4,151
Commercial driver's license; RCDL-restricted commercial driver's license; CLP-commercial learner's permit; form.

(1)(a) The commercial driver's license shall be conspicuously marked Nebraska Commercial Driver's License and shall be, to the maximum extent practicable, tamper and forgery proof. The commercial driver's license shall be marked Nondomiciled if the license is a nondomiciled commercial driver's license.

(b) The form of the commercial driver's license shall also comply with section 60-4,117.

(2) The RCDL-restricted commercial driver's license shall be conspicuously marked Nebraska Restricted Commercial Driver's License and shall be, to the maximum extent practicable, tamper and forgery proof. The RCDL-restricted commercial driver's license shall contain such additional information as deemed necessary by the director.

(3) The CLP-commercial learner's permit shall be conspicuously marked Nebraska Commercial Learner's Permit and shall be, to the maximum extent practicable, tamper and forgery proof. The permit shall also be marked Nondomiciled if the permit is a nondomiciled CLP-commercial learner's permit.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 101;

Laws 1992, LB 1178, § 5;

Laws 1993, LB 420, § 11;

Laws 2001, LB 34, § 6;

Laws 2001, LB 574, § 26;

Laws 2008, LB911, § 25;

Laws 2011, LB215, § 22;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 39;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 47.